Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 8. Rights of Jurors and Witnesses

§ 499.
Jurors and witnesses.

No employer may discharge an employee by reason of his or her service as a juror, or penalize such employee or deprive him or her of any right, privilege, or benefit on a basis which discriminates between such employee and other employees not serving as jurors. All employees shall be considered in the service of their employer during all times while serving as jurors in accordance with this section for purposes of determining seniority, fringe benefits, credit toward vacations, and other rights, privileges, and benefits of employment.

No employer may discharge an employee by reason of the employee’s absence from work while in attendance as a witness pursuant to a summons duly issued and served in any proceeding, civil or criminal, in any court of competent jurisdiction within or without the State, or in any other proceeding before a board, commission, attorney, or other person or tribunal in the State authorized by law to hear testimony under oath; nor shall an employer penalize such employee or deprive him or her of any right, privilege, or benefit on a basis which discriminates between such employee and other employees not appearing as witnesses. All employees shall be considered in the service of their employer while appearing as witnesses in accordance with this section for purposes of determining seniority, fringe benefits, credit toward vacations, and other rights, privileges, and benefits of employment.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 31, 1970.